Utah statutes.
73-3-1.   Appropriation -- Manner of acquiring water rights.
Rights to the use of the unappropriated public waters in this state may be
acquired only as provided in this title. No appropriation of water may be made
and no rights to the use thereof initiated and no notice of intent to
appropriate shall be recognized except application for such appropriation
first be made to the state engineer in the manner hereinafter provided, and
not otherwise. The appropriation must be for some useful and beneficial
purpose, and, as between appropriators, the one first in time shall be first
in rights; provided, that when a use designated by an application to
appropriate any of the unappropriated waters of the state would materially
interfere with a more beneficial use of such water, the application shall be
dealt with as provided in Section 73-3-8. No right to the use of water either
appropriated or unappropriated can be acquired by adverse use or adverse
possession.
